Maine, session 132, LD1910.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §20-B is enacted to read:
§20-B. Services to prevent homelessness
The department shall contract with community-based nonprofit organizations with
experience in outreach, engagement and social service delivery to individuals and families
experiencing homelessness in order to hire outreach caseworkers and housing stability
workers to work with individuals who are unhoused or experience chronic homelessness
by cycling through emergency settings such as shelters, jails, hospitals and warming
centers. The outreach caseworkers and housing stability workers shall assist individuals to
attain permanent housing, ensure ongoing support services once the individuals are housed
and ensure that unhoused individuals are in safe indoor spaces provided by emergency
shelters while housing is being secured.
Sec. 2. Department of Health and Human Services contracts for outreach
caseworkers. The Department of Health and Human Services shall issue a request for
proposals to contract for outreach caseworker services as required by the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 22, section 20-B. The contracts with community-based nonprofit
organizations must be sufficient to hire 9 outreach caseworkers. The department must
contract with organizations that have experience in outreach, engagement and social
service delivery to individuals and families experiencing homelessness. The contracts
issued under this section must be for a period of time set by the department, and the
department may renew the contracts at the end of the set period. The contracts must include
the following requirements.
1. Nine outreach caseworkers must be hired.
2. The caseworkers must work with unhoused individuals to attain permanent housing,
ensure ongoing support services once the individuals are housed and ensure that unhoused
individuals are in safe indoor spaces provided by emergency shelters while housing is being
secured.
3. The caseworkers must be distributed across the State, as determined by agreement
between the 3 regional homeless councils represented on the Statewide Homeless Council,
and targeted to areas that have the greatest concentration of unhoused individuals. As
circumstances change, the caseworkers may be redistributed geographically.
4. The caseload for the caseworkers must be up to 25 individuals with intensive needs
and up to 35 additional cases that require less intensive but ongoing support.
Sec. 3. Department of Health and Human Services contracts for housing
stability workers. The Department of Health and Human Services shall issue a request
for proposals to contract for housing stability workers as required by the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 22, section 20-B. The contracts with community-based nonprofit
organizations must be sufficient to hire 9 housing stability workers. The department must
contract with organizations that have experience in outreach, engagement and social
service delivery to individuals and families experiencing homelessness. The contracts
issued under this section must be for a period of time set by the department, and the
department may renew the contracts at the end of the set period. The contracts must include
the following requirements.
Page 1 - 132LR2394(01)

1. Nine housing stability workers must be hired.
2. The housing stability workers must work with individuals experiencing chronic
homelessness cycling through various emergency settings, such as shelters, jails, hospitals
and warming centers, and provide those individuals with intensive housing or rehousing
services to ensure housing stability.
3. The housing stability workers must be distributed across the State, as determined by
agreement between the 3 regional homeless councils represented on the Statewide
Homeless Council, and targeted to areas that have the greatest concentration of individuals
experiencing chronic homelessness. As circumstances change, the workers may be
redistributed geographically.
4. The caseload for the housing stability workers must be up to 25 individuals with
intensive needs and up to 35 additional cases that require less intensive but ongoing
support.
Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Provides funding to contract with community-based nonprofit organizations to
hire 9 outreach caseworkers.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $800,000 $800,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $800,000 $800,000
2240 Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Provides funding to contract with community-based nonprofit organizations to
hire 9 housing stability workers.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $900,000 $900,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $900,000 $900,000
3217
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $1,700,000 $1,700,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $1,700,000 $1,700,000